Georgia statutes. TITLE 47 Retirement and Pensions
CHAPTER 7A Georgia Class Nine Fire Department Pension Fund

47-7A-1 through 47-7A-127.
[Repealed]

History.

Ga. L. 2000, p. 562, § 10; Ga. L. 2001, p. 21, § 1; Ga. L. 2002, p. 589, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 54, §§ 4-6/HB 355; Ga. L. 2006, p. 426, § 2/HB 660; repealed by Ga. L. 2010, p. 438, § 9 and Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 55, effective July 1, 2010.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “The intent of this Act is to repeal obsolete and inoperative provisions and to make certain stylistic corrections in Title 47 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated. Nothing in this Act shall deny, abridge, increase, renew, revive, or on any way affect any right, benefit, option, credit, or election to which any person was entitled pursuant to such title on June 30, 2010, and the board of trustees of each public retirement system is authorized and directed to provide by regulation for the continuation of any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election not otherwise covered in this Act; provided, however, that any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election shall be subject to the statutory provisions in effect on June 30, 2010.”